hunspell-lij/lij_IT.aff
FLAG long
SFX 41 Y 27
SFX 41 0 0/1'E' o
SFX 41 o i/2' [^cgi]o
SFX 41 o hi/2' [cg]o
SFX 41 io i/2' [cg]io
SFX 41 o i/2' [^cg]io
SFX 41 o e/3'L' [^cgi]o
SFX 41 o he/3'L' [cg]o
SFX 41 io e/3'L' [cg]io
SFX 41 o e/3'L' [^cg]io
SFX 41 o an/6'E' o
SFX 41 o e/1'E' [^cgi]o
SFX 41 o he/1'E' [cg]o
SFX 41 io e/1'E' [cg]io
SFX 41 o e/1'E' [^cg]io
SFX 41 o i/2' [^cgi]o
SFX 41 o hi/2' [cg]o
SFX 41 io i/2' [cg]io
SFX 41 o i/2' [^cg]io
SFX 41 o e/3'L' [^cgi]o
SFX 41 o he/3'L' [cg]o
SFX 41 io e/3'L' [cg]io
SFX 41 o e/3'L' [^cg]io
SFX 41 o an/6'E' o
SFX 41 o i/ENEMET [^cgi]o
SFX 41 o hi/ENEMET [cg]o
SFX 41 io i/ENEMET [cg]io
SFX 41 o i/ENEMET [^cg]io

SFX 44 Y 41
SFX 44 0 0/4'E' immo
SFX 44 immo imo/4'E' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]immo
SFX 44 immo î/5'E' immo
SFX 44 immo iva/1'E' immo
SFX 44 immo ivo/1'E'-- immo
SFX 44 immo ivi/2' immo
SFX 44 immo iva/3'L' immo
SFX 44 immo ivimo/4'E' immo
SFX 44 immo ivi/5'E' immo
SFX 44 immo ivan/6'E' immo
SFX 44 immo iò/1'E' immo
SFX 44 immo iö/1'E'-- immo
SFX 44 immo iæ/2' immo
SFX 44 immo ià/3'L' immo
SFX 44 immo iâ/3'L'-- immo
SFX 44 immo iemo/4'E' immo
SFX 44 immo iei/5'E' immo
SFX 44 immo ian/6'E' immo
SFX 44 0 0/4'E' immo
SFX 44 immo imo/4'E' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]immo
SFX 44 immo î/5'E' immo
SFX 44 immo isse/1'E' immo
SFX 44 immo isci/2' immo
SFX 44 immo isse/3'L' immo
SFX 44 immo iscimo/4'E' immo
SFX 44 immo isci/5'E' immo
SFX 44 immo issan/6'E' immo
SFX 44 immo ieiva/1'E' immo
SFX 44 immo iæ/1'E' immo
SFX 44 immo iësci/2' immo
SFX 44 immo ieiva/3'L' immo
SFX 44 immo iæ/3'L' immo
SFX 44 immo iëscimo/4'E' immo
SFX 44 immo iësci/5'E' immo
SFX 44 immo ieivan/6'E' immo
SFX 44 immo iæn/6'E' immo
SFX 44 0 0/ENETES immo
SFX 44 immo imo/ENETES [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]immo
SFX 44 immo î/ENEMEV immo
SFX 44 immo indo/ENEMETEVES immo
SFX 44 immo î/O'ENEMETEVES immo

PFX E' Y 7
PFX E' 0 ch' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX E' 0 s' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX E' 0 comm' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX E' 0 quand' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX E' 0 dond' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX E' 0 cös' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX E' 0 quant' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]

PFX e' Y 7
PFX e' 0 ch'/-- [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX e' 0 s'/-- [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX e' 0 comm'/-- [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX e' 0 quand'/-- [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX e' 0 dond'/-- [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX e' 0 cös'/-- [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX e' 0 quant'/-- [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]

PFX P' Y 6
PFX P' 0 m' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX P' 0 t' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX P' 0 gh' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX P' 0 n' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX P' 0 v' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX P' 0 s' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]

PFX 1' Y 6
PFX 1' 0 m' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 1' 0 t' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 1' 0 l' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 1' 0 gh' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 1' 0 n' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 1' 0 v' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]

PFX 2' Y 5
PFX 2' 0 m' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 2' 0 t' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 2' 0 l' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 2' 0 gh' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 2' 0 n' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]

PFX 3' Y 7
PFX 3' 0 m' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 3' 0 t' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 3' 0 l' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 3' 0 gh' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 3' 0 n' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 3' 0 v' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 3' 0 s' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]

PFX L' Y 1
PFX L' 0 l' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]

PFX 4' Y 6
PFX 4' 0 t' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 4' 0 l' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 4' 0 gh' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 4' 0 n' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 4' 0 v' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 4' 0 s' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]

PFX 5' Y 5
PFX 5' 0 m' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 5' 0 l' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 5' 0 gh' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 5' 0 n' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 5' 0 v' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]

PFX 6' Y 7
PFX 6' 0 m' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 6' 0 t' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 6' 0 l' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 6' 0 gh' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 6' 0 n' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 6' 0 v' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX 6' 0 s' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]

SFX EN Y 20
SFX EN 0 ghe .
SFX EN 0 ghene .
SFX EN 0 ghelo .
SFX EN 0 gheo .
SFX EN 0 ghela .
SFX EN 0 ghea .
SFX EN 0 gheli .
SFX EN 0 ghei .
SFX EN 0 ghele .
SFX EN 0 ghee .
SFX EN 0 ne .
SFX EN 0 ne .
SFX EN 0 lo .
SFX EN 0 o [^âîaeiou]
SFX EN 0 la .
SFX EN 0 a [^âîaeiou]
SFX EN 0 li .
SFX EN 0 i [^âîaeiou]
SFX EN 0 le .
SFX EN 0 e [^âîaeiou]

SFX EM Y 12
SFX EM 0 me .
SFX EM 0 mene .
SFX EM 0 meghe .
SFX EM 0 meghe .
SFX EM 0 melo .
SFX EM 0 meo .
SFX EM 0 mela .
SFX EM 0 mea .
SFX EM 0 meli .
SFX EM 0 mei .
SFX EM 0 mele .
SFX EM 0 mee .

SFX ET Y 12
SFX ET 0 te .
SFX ET 0 tene .
SFX ET 0 teghe .
SFX ET 0 teghe .
SFX ET 0 telo .
SFX ET 0 teo .
SFX ET 0 tela .
SFX ET 0 tea .
SFX ET 0 teli .
SFX ET 0 tei .
SFX ET 0 tele .
SFX ET 0 tee .

SFX ES Y 12
SFX ES 0 se .
SFX ES 0 sene .
SFX ES 0 seghe .
SFX ES 0 seghe .
SFX ES 0 selo .
SFX ES 0 seo .
SFX ES 0 sela .
SFX ES 0 sea .
SFX ES 0 seli .
SFX ES 0 sei .
SFX ES 0 sele .
SFX ES 0 see .

SFX EV Y 12
SFX EV 0 ve .
SFX EV 0 vene .
SFX EV 0 veghe .
SFX EV 0 veghe .
SFX EV 0 velo .
SFX EV 0 veo .
SFX EV 0 vela .
SFX EV 0 vea .
SFX EV 0 veli .
SFX EV 0 vei .
SFX EV 0 vele .
SFX EV 0 vee .

SFX E2 Y 38
SFX E2 0 mme .
SFX E2 0 mmene .
SFX E2 0 mmelo .
SFX E2 0 mmeo .
SFX E2 0 mmela .
SFX E2 0 mmea .
SFX E2 0 mmeli .
SFX E2 0 mmei .
SFX E2 0 mmele .
SFX E2 0 mmee .
SFX E2 0 tte .
SFX E2 0 ttene .
SFX E2 0 tteghe .
SFX E2 0 tteghe .
SFX E2 0 ttelo .
SFX E2 0 tteo .
SFX E2 0 ttela .
SFX E2 0 ttea .
SFX E2 0 tteli .
SFX E2 0 ttei .
SFX E2 0 ttele .
SFX E2 0 ttee .
SFX E2 0 nne .
SFX E2 0 nne .
SFX E2 0 gghe .
SFX E2 0 gghene .
SFX E2 0 gghelo .
SFX E2 0 ggheo .
SFX E2 0 gghela .
SFX E2 0 gghea .
SFX E2 0 ggheli .
SFX E2 0 gghei .
SFX E2 0 gghele .
SFX E2 0 gghee .
SFX E2 0 llo .
SFX E2 0 lla .
SFX E2 0 lli .
SFX E2 0 lle .

PFX O' Y 10
PFX O' 0 l' [AEIOUÆÄËÏÖaàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX O' 0 L' [AEIOUÆÄËÏÖ]
PFX O' 0 d' [AEIOUÆÄËÏÖaàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX O' 0 D' [AEIOUÆÄËÏÖ]
PFX O' 0 st' [AEIOUÆÄËÏÖaàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX O' 0 St' [AEIOUÆÄËÏÖ]
PFX O' 0 quest' [AEIOUÆÄËÏÖaàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX O' 0 Quest' [AEIOUÆÄËÏÖ]
PFX O' 0 quell' [AEIOUÆÄËÏÖaàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX O' 0 Quell' [AEIOUÆÄËÏÖ]

PFX A' Y 2
PFX A' 0 unn' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]
PFX A' 0 'n' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]

PFX I' Y 1
PFX I' 0 d' [aàäâeèéëêiîïoôöòuæ]

SFX 1i Y 3
SFX 1i 0 0/2' i
SFX 1i 0 0/2' i
SFX 1i 0 0/ENEMET~~ i

SFX 1e Y 2
SFX 1e 0 0/1'E' e
SFX 1e 0 0/3'L' e

SFX pp Y 13
SFX pp 0 0 ou
SFX pp ou æ ou
SFX pp ou â ou
SFX pp ou æ ou
SFX pp 0 0 o
SFX pp o a o
SFX pp o i [^rsaàeèéioòuæ]so
SFX pp so xi [aàeèéioòuæ]so
SFX pp o ci rso
SFX pp sso sci [^i]sso
SFX pp o i isso
SFX pp o i [^s]o
SFX pp o e o

SFX vd Y 59
SFX vd 0 0/1'E' duo
SFX vd o xi/2' duo
SFX vd o xe/3'L' duo
SFX vd o xemmo/4'E' duo
SFX vd o xei/5'E' duo
SFX vd o xan/6'E' duo
SFX vd o xeiva/1'E' duo
SFX vd o xeivo/1'E'-- duo
SFX vd o iva/1'E' duo
SFX vd o ivo/1'E'-- duo
SFX vd o xeivi/2' duo
SFX vd o ivi/2' duo
SFX vd o xeiva/3'L' duo
SFX vd o iva/3'L' duo
SFX vd o xeivimo/4'E' duo
SFX vd o ivimo/4'E' duo
SFX vd o xeivi/5'E' duo
SFX vd o ivi/5'E' duo
SFX vd o xeivan/6'E' duo
SFX vd o ivan/6'E' duo
SFX vd o iò/1'E' duo
SFX vd o iö/1'E'-- duo
SFX vd o iæ/2' duo
SFX vd o ià/3'L' duo
SFX vd o iâ/3'L'-- duo
SFX vd o iemo/4'E' duo
SFX vd o iei/5'E' duo
SFX vd o ian/6'E' duo
SFX vd o xe/1'E' duo
SFX vd o xi/2' duo
SFX vd o xe/3'L' duo
SFX vd o xemmo/4'E' duo
SFX vd o xei/5'E' duo
SFX vd o xan/6'E' duo
SFX vd o xesse/1'E' duo
SFX vd o xesci/2' duo
SFX vd o xesse/3'L' duo
SFX vd o xescimo/4'E' duo
SFX vd o xesci/5'E' duo
SFX vd o xessan/6'E' duo
SFX vd o ieiva/1'E' duo
SFX vd o iæ/1'E' duo
SFX vd o iësci/2' duo
SFX vd o ieiva/3'L' duo
SFX vd o iæ/3'L' duo
SFX vd o iëscimo/4'E' duo
SFX vd o iësci/5'E' duo
SFX vd o ieivan/6'E' duo
SFX vd o iæn/6'E' duo
SFX vd o xi/ENEMET duo
SFX vd o xemmo/ENETES duo
SFX vd o xei/ENEMEV duo
SFX vd o xendo/ENEMETEVES duo
SFX vd o e/O' duo
SFX vd o i/O'ENEMETEVES~~ duo
SFX vd o to duo
SFX vd o ta duo
SFX vd o ti duo
SFX vd o te duo

SFX vg Y 50
SFX vg 0 0/1'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo æ/2' aggo
SFX vg aggo à/3'L' aggo
SFX vg aggo emmo/4'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo æ/5'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo an/6'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo ava/1'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo avo/1'E'-- aggo
SFX vg aggo avi/2' aggo
SFX vg aggo ava/3'L' aggo
SFX vg aggo avimo/4'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo avi/5'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo avan/6'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo aiò/1'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo aiö/1'E'-- aggo
SFX vg aggo aiæ/2' aggo
SFX vg aggo aià/3'L' aggo
SFX vg aggo aiâ/3'L'-- aggo
SFX vg aggo aiemo/4'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo aiei/5'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo aian/6'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo agghe/1'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo agghi/2' aggo
SFX vg aggo agghe/3'L' aggo
SFX vg aggo emmo/4'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo æ/5'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo aggan/6'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo esse/1'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo esci/2' aggo
SFX vg aggo esse/3'L' aggo
SFX vg aggo escimo/4'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo esci/5'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo essan/6'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo aieiva/1'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo aiæ/1'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo aiësci/2' aggo
SFX vg aggo aieiva/3'L' aggo
SFX vg aggo aiæ/3'L' aggo
SFX vg aggo aiëscimo/4'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo aiësci/5'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo aieivan/6'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo aiæn/6'E' aggo
SFX vg aggo anni/ENEMET aggo
SFX vg aggo a/E2~~ aggo
SFX vg aggo emmo/ENETES aggo
SFX vg aggo æ/ENEMEV aggo
SFX vg aggo æto aggo
SFX vg aggo æta aggo
SFX vg aggo æti aggo
SFX vg aggo æte aggo

SFX vh Y 5
SFX vh 0 0/O'ENEMETEVES â
SFX vh â ando/ENEMETEVES â
SFX vh ae ae/O' ae
SFX vh ae ai/O'ENEMETEVES~~ ae
SFX vh ae ando/ENEMETEVES ae

SFX vx Y 52
SFX vx 0 0/1'E' o
SFX vx o i/2' o
SFX vx o e/3'L' o
SFX vx o emmo/4'E' o
SFX vx o ei/5'E' o
SFX vx o an/6'E' o
SFX vx o eiva/1'E' o
SFX vx o eivo/1'E'-- o
SFX vx o eivi/2' o
SFX vx o eiva/3'L' o
SFX vx o eivimo/4'E' o
SFX vx o eivi/5'E' o
SFX vx o eivan/6'E' o
SFX vx o iò/1'E' o
SFX vx o iö/1'E'-- o
SFX vx o iæ/2' o
SFX vx o ià/3'L' o
SFX vx o iâ/3'L'-- o
SFX vx o iemo/4'E' o
SFX vx o iei/5'E' o
SFX vx o ian/6'E' o
SFX vx o e/1'E' o
SFX vx o i/2' o
SFX vx o e/3'L' o
SFX vx o emmo/4'E' o
SFX vx o ei/5'E' o
SFX vx o an/6'E' o
SFX vx o esse/1'E' o
SFX vx o esci/2' o
SFX vx o esse/3'L' o
SFX vx o escimo/4'E' o
SFX vx o esci/5'E' o
SFX vx o essan/6'E' o
SFX vx o ieiva/1'E' o
SFX vx o iæ/1'E' o
SFX vx o iësci/2' o
SFX vx o ieiva/3'L' o
SFX vx o iæ/3'L' o
SFX vx o iëscimo/4'E' o
SFX vx o iësci/5'E' o
SFX vx o ieivan/6'E' o
SFX vx o iæn/6'E' o
SFX vx o i/ENEMET o
SFX vx o emmo/ENETES o
SFX vx o ei/ENEMEV o
SFX vx o endo/ENEMETEVES o
SFX vx o e/O' o
SFX vx o i/O'ENEMETEVES~~ o
SFX vx o io o
SFX vx o ia o
SFX vx o ii o
SFX vx o ie o

SFX vy Y 51
SFX vy 0 0/1'E' o
SFX vy o i/2' o
SFX vy o e/3'L' o
SFX vy o immo/4'E' o
SFX vy o î/5'E' o
SFX vy o an/6'E' o
SFX vy o iva/1'E' o
SFX vy o ivo/1'E'-- o
SFX vy o ivi/2' o
SFX vy o iva/3'L' o
SFX vy o ivimo/4'E' o
SFX vy o ivi/5'E' o
SFX vy o ivan/6'E' o
SFX vy o iò/1'E' o
SFX vy o iö/1'E'-- o
SFX vy o iæ/2' o
SFX vy o ià/3'L' o
SFX vy o iâ/3'L'-- o
SFX vy o iemo/4'E' o
SFX vy o iei/5'E' o
SFX vy o ian/6'E' o
SFX vy o e/1'E' o
SFX vy o i/2' o
SFX vy o e/3'L' o
SFX vy o immo/4'E' o
SFX vy o î/5'E' o
SFX vy o an/6'E' o
SFX vy o isse/1'E' o
SFX vy o isci/2' o
SFX vy o isse/3'L' o
SFX vy o iscimo/4'E' o
SFX vy o isci/5'E' o
SFX vy o issan/6'E' o
SFX vy o ieiva/1'E' o
SFX vy o iæ/1'E' o
SFX vy o iësci/2' o
SFX vy o ieiva/3'L' o
SFX vy o iæ/3'L' o
SFX vy o iëscimo/4'E' o
SFX vy o iësci/5'E' o
SFX vy o ieivan/6'E' o
SFX vy o iæn/6'E' o
SFX vy o i/ENEMET o
SFX vy o immo/ENETES o
SFX vy o î/ENEMEV o
SFX vy o indo/ENEMETEVES o
SFX vy o î/O'ENEMETEVES o
SFX vy o io o
SFX vy o ia o
SFX vy o ii o
SFX vy o ie o
